New Jersey, session 221, A3631.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary, any person with a disability who is between 18 and 21 years of age shall be eligible to receive direct support professional services from the Department of Human Services. b.    The Commissioner of Human Services, in consultation with the Commissioner of Children and Families and the Assistant Commissioner of the Division of Developmental Disabilities in the Department of Human Services, shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section. c.     As used in this section: Direct support professional means an individual who provides direct, non-medical supportive assistance, on a daily basis, to a person who has a physical, intellectual, or developmental disability, with the aim of helping the person to:  become better integrated into the community or the least restrictive environment; more effectively understand, communicate, and advocate for, the persons individual needs and desires; identify and participate in positive employment, job coaching, and training opportunities; make informed choices, and better understand the options and possible consequences of choices relating to physical health, safety, and emotional well-being; address challenging behaviors through a person-centered approach; successfully engage in the basic activities of daily living; identify and participate in activities that promote a healthy lifestyle; and otherwise lead a self-directed and autonomous life. Person with a disability means a person who has a physical, intellectual, or developmental disability. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.